Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-266
Towns; meetings; provisions inapplicable to cities.

None of the provisions of sections 23-201 to 23-299, with respect to the meetings of electors of their respective towns and their powers, shall apply to towns whose limits are coextensive with cities of the primary, first and second class, but such cities, and the inhabitants thereof, shall continue to be governed by the laws specially applicable thereto, except that the inhabitants thereof shall have such power as is conferred by law or election in the choosing of supervisors, assessors, judges and clerks of election, and other county officers.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 66, p. 150;

R.S.1913, § 1050;

C.S.1922, § 952;

C.S.1929, § 26-266;

R.S.1943, § 23-266.